California, session 20252026, SB1071.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 10.5 (commencing with Section 103210) is added to Part 1 of Division 102 of the Health and Safety Code, to read: CHAPTER 10.5. Certificate Issued After Judicial Determination of Manner of Death103210. (a) When a judicial determination of a manner of a deceased person’s death has become final, a family member of the deceased may submit a written request to the State Registrar for a new death certificate for the deceased person on the ground that the manner of death stated on the registered certificate does not reflect the ultimate judicial determination. The request shall be supported by a certified copy of the plea, verdict, statement of decision, or judgment showing either expressly or implicitly that the manner of death was determined by a finder of fact to be different than stated on the existing certificate.(b) The State Registrar shall review the request and issue a new death certificate with the judicially determined manner of death identified in the request if all of the following criteria are met:(1) The request identifies the determination of manner of death in the certified court record.(2) The request identifies a differing manner of death stated on the existing certificate.(3) The request is accompanied with the payment of the fee required by Section 103700.(c) Once the certificate is issued, the State Registrar shall transmit copies of the new death certificate to both of the following:(1) The local registrar and county recorder in whose offices copies of the previously issued death certificate are on file.(2) The person who submitted the request.(d) Upon receipt of the new death certificate, the local registrar and county recorder shall transmit any copies of the previously issued death certificate to the State Registrar if it is practical to do so. If it is impractical to do so, then they shall effectually seal a cover over the copy in a manner as not to deface or destroy the copy and forward a verified statement of their action to the state registrar.(e) The new death certificate shall supplant any previously issued death certificate registered for the deceased person and shall be the only death certificate of the deceased person open to public inspection. The request and previously issued death certificate shall remain as part of the records of the State Registrar. All records and information referred to in this section, other than the newly issued death certificate, shall be available only upon the order of a court of competent jurisdiction. (f) (1) A plea, verdict, statement of decision, or judgment reflects a judicial determination that the manner of death was a homicide if it shows criminal responsibility or civil liability for the murder, the manslaughter, an act causing the death, the wrongful death, or an act that to a reasonable person is likely to cause great bodily injury and results in the death, of the deceased person.(2) A family member of the deceased may include additional certified court records with the request in subdivision (a) to permit the State Registrar to determine that the manner of death was judicially determined to be a homicide and explain the relevance of the additional records.(3) A determination by the State Registrar under this section shall be based solely on the request and certified court documents submitted with the request, and the State Registrar is not required to obtain or review any additional documents. SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.